Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2895.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 10 O.S. 2021, Section 405.4, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 405.4. A. Any person with a bachelor's degree or
postgraduate degree shall be considered as having met the
educational requirements for a director of a full-time child care
center required by the Department of Human Services. Nothing in
this section shall be construed as to affect annual continuing
education requirements. The director of a child care center may
also qualify as a master teacher for children of all ages.
B. 1. Any person replacing a master teacher at a child care
center shall be granted a one-year probationary period to fulfill
the educational qualifications required by the Department for a
master teacher. The Department may extend the probationary period
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2895 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

an a dditional year as long as the person is actively pursuing that
goal.
2. Directors shall have sixty (60) days to appoint a
probationary master teacher.
C. Licensed child care facilities opened or expanded before
November 1, 2016, shall have thirty-five (35) square feet of floor
area per infant in rooms occupied only by infants. New construction
and existing space not previously licensed for child care after
November 1, 2016, shall have forty (40) square feet of floor area
per infant in rooms occupied only by infants.
D. In determining the number of master teachers required based
on license capacity and desired Star level, after school care
children shall not be counted toward the license capacity.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
April 21, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED









SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2895 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)